Wisconsin, session 2025, SB185.
do enact as follows:SB185,11Section 1. 70.11 (29m) of the statutes is renumbered 70.11 (29m) (a).SB185,22Section 2. 70.11 (29m) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB185,2,9370.11 (29m) (b) All the property owned or leased by an organization that is 4exempt from taxation under section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as 5confirmed by a determination letter issued by the Internal Revenue Service no later 6than October 1, 1990, if all of the property is used for the purposes for which the 7exemption was granted, the property includes one or more theaters for performing 8theater arts which have a total seating capacity of not less than 240 persons, and 9the organization operates the theater or theaters.SB185,310Section 3. 70.11 (29p) of the statutes is repealed.SB185,411Section 4. Initial applicability.SB185,2,1212(1) This act first applies to property tax assessments as of January 1, 2025.SB185,2,1313